Hawaii statutes.
§386-125 Knowledge of employer imputed to
insurance carrier. Every policy and contract shall contain a provision
that, as between the employee and the insurance carrier, the notice to or
knowledge of the occurrence of the injury on the part of the employer shall be
deemed notice or knowledge, as the case may be, on the part of the insurance
carrier; that jurisdiction of the employer shall, for the purpose of this
chapter, be jurisdiction of the insurance carrier, and that the insurance
carrier shall in all respects be bound by and subject to the orders, findings,
and decisions rendered against the employer for the payment of compensation
under this chapter. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-124; HRS §386-125]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next